Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska18-3312
Additions; plat; vacation; right of owner to plat.

The owner of any lots in a plat vacated under section 18-3308 may cause such lots and a proportionate part of adjacent streets and public grounds to be platted and numbered by the county surveyor. When such plat is acknowledged by such owner and is recorded in the record office of the county, such lots may be conveyed and assessed by the numbers given them on such plat.

Laws 1879, § 112, p. 235;

R.S.1913, § 5100;

C.S.1922, § 4273;

C.S.1929, § 17-422;

R.S.1943, § 17-423;

R.S.1943, (2012), § 17-423;

Laws 2017, LB133, § 323.